Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.560

Application of RCW 42.56.550.

The procedures in RCW 42.56.550 govern denials of an opportunity to inspect or copy a public record by the office of the secretary of the senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

[ 2005 c 274 s 289; 1995 c 397 s 16. Formerly RCW 42.17.341.]